Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-527
Sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement; how made.

Any sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in section 58-526 may be made by a public body or taxing body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 27.